Utah statutes.
53A-2-203.5.   Recognition of guardianship.

(1)  A document issued by other than a court of law which purports to award guardianship to a person who is not a legal resident of the jurisdiction in which the guardianship is awarded is not valid in the state of Utah until reviewed and approved by a Utah court.

(2)  The procedure for obtaining approval under Subsection (1) is the procedure required under Title 75, Chapter 5, Part 2, for obtaining a court appointment of a guardian.

